Hawaii statutes.
§134-7.3 Seizure of firearms upon
disqualification. (a) If any applicant is denied a permit, the chiefs of
police of the respective counties shall send, by certified mail, a notice
setting forth the reasons for the denial and may require that the applicant
voluntarily surrender all firearms and ammunition to the chief of police where
the applicant resides or dispose of all firearms and ammunition. If an
applicant fails to voluntarily surrender or dispose of all firearms and
ammunition within thirty days from the date notice was mailed, the chief of
police may seize all firearms and ammunition.

(b) Any person disqualified from ownership,
possession, or control of firearms and ammunition under section 134-7 shall
voluntarily surrender all firearms and ammunition to the chief of police where
the person resides or dispose of all firearms and ammunition. If any person
fails to voluntarily surrender or dispose of all firearms and ammunition within
thirty days from the date of disqualification, the chief of police may seize
all firearms and ammunition.

(c) For the purposes of this section,
"dispose" means selling the firearms to a gun dealer licensed under
section 134-31, transferring ownership of the firearms to any person who meets
the requirements of section 134-2, or surrendering all firearms to the chief of
police where the person resides for storage or disposal; provided, for a person
subject to section 134-7(f), "dispose" shall not include transferring
ownership of the firearms to any person who meets the requirements of section
134-2.

(d) The chief of police of the respective
counties shall adopt procedures to implement and administer the provisions of
this section by December 31, 2001. [L 2000, c 127, §1; am L 2004, c 4, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next